05_Project/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-vouloir
%<c4%>%<inf%>: voul%>oir #;							! infinitive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<part%>: voul%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: voul%>u Adj;				! past participle

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: veu%>x #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: veu%>x #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: veu%>t #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: voul%>ez #;	! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: veul%>ent #;	! present indicative

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: voul V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: voud%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: voud%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: veuill%>e #;	! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: veuill%>es #;	! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: veuill%>e #;	! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: voul%>iez #;	! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: veuill%>ent #;	! present subjunctive

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: vouluss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: voulût #;		! imperfect subjunctive

LEXICON Verbs
vouloir%<verb%>: V-vouloir;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to want, wish"
